Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.295

License required.

(1) It is unlawful for any agency to care for children unless the agency is licensed as provided in this chapter.

(2) A license issued under chapter 74.15 RCW before July 1, 2006, for an agency subject to this chapter after July 1, 2006, is valid until its next renewal, unless otherwise suspended or revoked by the department.

[ 2006 c 265 s 306. Formerly RCW 43.215.250.]